District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.03

Eligibility criteria for private, nonprofit corporation.

A private, nonprofit corporation shall be eligible to receive a grant under § 38-1806.02 if the corporation is a national business organization incorporated in the District of Columbia, that:

(1)

Has a board of directors which includes members who are also chief executive officers of technology-related corporations involved in education and workforce development issues;

(2)

Has extensive practical experience with initiatives that link business resources and expertise with education and training systems;

(3)

Has experience in working with State and local educational agencies throughout the United States with respect to the integration of academic studies with workforce preparation programs; and

(4)

Has a nationwide structure through which additional resources can be leveraged and innovative practices disseminated.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [265], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2603
This section is referenced in § 38-1806.02.
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.63.